zh-TW: 吉他滑音管樣式: 子彈形滑音棒 (膝上鋼棒吉他); 全管; 半管; 指關節滑管; 戒指滑管; Stevens 滑音棒 (多布羅/共鳴吉他); 其他
nl: Gitaarslidestijl: Bullet tonebar (lapsteel); Volledige buis; Halve slide; Knuckle-slide; Ring-slide; Stevens tonebar (dobro/resonator); Overig
en: Guitar slide style: Bullet tone bar (lap steel); Full tube; Half slide; Knuckle slide; Ring slide; Stevens tone bar (dobro/resonator); Other
nb: Slide-stil for gitar: Bullet tone bar (lap steel); Helt rør; Halv slide; Knoke-slide; Ring-slide; Stevens tone bar (dobro/resonator); Annet
it: Stile dello slide per chitarra: Tone bar a proiettile (lap steel); Tubo intero; Mezzo slide; Slide da nocca; Slide ad anello; Tone bar Stevens (dobro/resonatore); Altro
sl-SI: Stil drsnika za kitaro: Zaobljeni slide (lap steel); Polna cev; Polovični slide; Slide za členke; Slide v obliki prstana; Slide Stevens (dobro/resonatorska kitara); Drugo
ro-RO: Stil de slide pentru chitară: Bară de ton tip glonț (lap steel); Tub complet; Jumătate de slide; Slide pentru articulație; Slide inel; Bară de ton Stevens (dobro/rezonator); Altele
zh-CN: 吉他滑棒样式: 子弹形滑棒（夏威夷吉他）; 全管; 半滑棒; 指关节滑棒; 戒指滑棒; Stevens 滑棒（多布罗/共鸣吉他）; 其他
ja: ギタースライドスタイル: ブレットトーンバー (ラップスチール); フルチューブ; ハーフスライド; ナックルスライド; リングスライド; スティーブンストーンバー (ドブロ/リゾネーター); その他
sv: Gitarrslide-modell: Bullet tonebar (lap steel); Helt rör; Halvt slide-rör; Knuckle-slide; Ring-slide; Stevens tonebar (dobro/resonator); Övrigt
tr: Gitar slide kaplama tipi: Mermi ton çubuğu (lap steel); Tam tüp; Yarım slide; Eklem slide; Yüzük slide; Stevens ton çubuğu (dobro/rezonatör); Diğer
bg-BG: Стил на слайда за китара: Тонбар тип куршум (lap steel); Цяла тръба; Полуслайд; Слайд за кокалчета; Слайд тип пръстен; Тонбар Stevens (добро/резонаторна китара); Други
es: Estilo de slide para guitarra: Barra de tono tipo bala (lap steel); Tubo completo; Medio tubo; Slide para nudillos; Slide de anillo; Barra de tono Stevens (dobro/resonador); Otro
cs: Styl hry s kytarovým slidem: Bullet tone bar (lap steel); Celý tubus; Poloviční slide; Slide na kloub; Slide jako prsten; Stevens tone bar (dobro/rezonátor); Ostatní
ru: Стиль слайда для гитары: Тон-бар (для лэп-стил гитар); Полная трубка; Полуслайд; На фалангу; Слайд-кольцо; Тон-бар Стивенса (для добро/резонаторных гитар); Другое
th: รูปแบบสไลด์สายกีตาร์: โทนบาร์ทรงกระสุน (แลปสตีล); แบบท่อเต็ม; สไลด์แบบครึ่ง; สไลด์ข้อนิ้ว; สไลด์แบบแหวน; โทนบาร์ Stevens (โดโบร/รีโซเนเตอร์); อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Estilo de slide de guitarra: Barra de tom bullet (lap steel); Tubo completo; Meio slide; Slide de nós dos dedos; Slide em anel; Barra de tom Stevens (dobro/ressonador); Outro
vi: Kiểu slide guitar: Thanh tone dạng viên đạn (đàn lap steel); Ống toàn phần; Nửa ống; Ống trượt đốt ngón tay; Ống trượt dạng nhẫn; Thanh tone Stevens (đàn dobro/cộng hưởng); Khác
el: Slide κιθάρας: Bullet tone bar (lap steel); Πλήρης σωλήνας; Μισό slide; Slide αρθρώσεων (Knuckle slide); Slide δαχτυλίδι; Stevens tone bar (dobro/resonator); Άλλο
sk-SK: Štýl gitarového slajdu: Tonebar v tvare náboja (lap steel); Celá trubička; Polovičný slide; Slide na kĺb; Prstencový slide; Tonebar Stevens (dobro/rezonátor); Iné
pt-BR: Estilo de slide da guitarra: Barra de tom tipo bala (lap steel); Tubo completo; Meio slide; Slide para junta do dedo; Slide em anel; Barra de tom Stevens (dobro/resonador); Outro
da: Guitarslidestil: Bullet tonebar (lap steel); Fuldt rør; Halvt slide; Knuckle-slide; Ring-slide; Stevens tonebar (dobro/resonator); Andet
hu: Gitárcsúszka stílusa: Golyó alakú tone bar (lap steel); Teljes cső; Félcső; Ujjízületre húzható slide; Gyűrűs slide; Stevens tone bar (dobro/rezonátoros); Egyéb
lt-LT: Gitarų slaido stilius: „Bullet tone bar“ (havajietiškai gitarai); Pilnas vamzdelis; Pusinis slydiklis; Slydiklis ant sąnario; Žiedinis slydiklis; „Stevens tone bar“ (dobro / rezonatoriui); Kita
de: Gitarren-Slide-Stil: Bullet Tone Bar (Lap-Steel); Ganzrohr; Half Slide; Knuckle Slide; Ring Slide; Stevens Tone Bar (Dobro/Resonator); Sonstige
pl: Styl slidera do gitary: Tone bar w kształcie pocisku (lap steel); Pełna rurka; Pół rurki; Knuckle slide; Slide pierścieniowy; Stevens tone bar (dobro/rezonator); Inne
fr: Style de slide pour guitare: Tone bar en forme de balle (lap steel); Tube complet; Demi-slide; Slide d’articulation; Slide bague; Tone bar Stevens (dobro/résonateur); Autre
fi: Kitaran slideputken tyyli: Bullet-tonebar (lap steel); Täysi putki; Puolikas slide; Nivelslide; Rengasslide; Stevens-tonebar (dobro/resonaattori); Muu
ko: 기타 슬라이드 스타일: 불릿 톤 바(랩 스틸); 풀 튜브; 하프 슬라이드; 너클 슬라이드; 링 슬라이드; 스티븐스 톤 바(도브로/리조네이터); 기타
hr-HR: Stil gitarskog slajda: Bullet tone bar (lap steel); Cijela cijev; Polovični slide; Zglobni slide; Prstenasti slide; Stevens tone bar (dobro/rezonator); Ostalo